Utah statutes.
49-16-505.   Benefits for surviving spouse under Division A or Division B.

The spouse at the time of death, if eligible, shall receive a benefit computed under either Division A or Division B, whichever provides the larger benefit, but may not receive a benefit under both divisions if it would result in a duplicate benefit.



Enacted by Chapter 250, 2002 General Session

